src/verb-kca-morph.txt
LEXICON VTag
 V-VowelStem ;
 V-ConsonantStem ;

LEXICON V-VowelStem
 V-VowelStem-Prs ;

LEXICON V-ConsonantStem
 V-ConsonantStem-Prs ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PRESENT !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V-VowelStem-Prs
!! Subject
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg:%>ӆ%>ам K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg:%>ӆ%>ӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg:%>ӆ K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du:%>ӆ%>мӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du:%>ӆ%>тӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du:%>ӆ%>ӈӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl:%>ӆ%>ўв K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl:%>ӆ%>ты K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl:%>ӆ%>ӑт K ; !
!! Object
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эм K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+Oc3:%>ӆӆы K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эмн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+Oc3:%>ӆ%>ӆӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+Oc3:%>ӆӆӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эв K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+Oc3:%>ӆ%>ӆӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эӆ K ; !
!!Passive
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc1Sg:%>ӆ%>айм K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc2Sg:%>ӆ%>ӑйн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc3Sg:%>ӆа K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc1Du:%>ӆ%>аймӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc2Du:%>ӆ%>айтӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc3Du:%>ӆ%>айӈӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc1Pl:%>ӆ%>айўв K ; 
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc2Pl:%>ӆ%>айты K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc3Pl:%>ӆ%>айт K ; !

LEXICON V-ConsonantStem-Prs
!! Subject
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg:%>ӆ%>ам K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg:%>ӆ%>ӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg:%>ӆ K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du:%>ӆ%>амн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du:%>ӆ%>атн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du:%>ӆ%>аӈӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl:%>ӆ%>ўв K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl:%>ӆ%>аты K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl:%>ӆ%>ӑт K ; !
!! Object
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эм K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+Oc3:%>ӆ%>аӆӆы K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эмн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+Oc3:%>ӆ%>аӆн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+Oc3:%>ӆ%>аӆн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эв K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+Oc3:%>ӆ%>аӆн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+Oc3:%>ӆ%>эӆ K ; !
!! Passive
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc1Sg:%>ӆ%>айм K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc2Sg:%>ӆ%>ӑйн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc3Sg:%>ӆа K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc1Du:%>ӆ%>аймӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc2Du:%>ӆ%>айтӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc3Du:%>ӆ%>айӈӑн K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc1Pl:%>ӆ%>айўв K ; 
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc2Pl:%>ӆ%>айты K ; !
+Pred+Ind+Prs+Pc3Pl:%>ӆ%>айт K ; !


!! -ӆ-эм Ӆӆ


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PRETERITE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! IMPERATIVE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! CONDITIONAL PRESENT !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! REFLEXIVE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!! PRESENT !!



!! IMPERFECT !!



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! CONDITIONAL PRESENT !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!




!!

!LEXICON V-ConsonantStem



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! IMPERATIVE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! CONDITIONAL !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! REFLEXIVE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!





!! INFINITIVE !!

+Der/ты+Inf:ты K ;
+Der/ты+Inf+Lat:тыя K ;
